Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8051.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9-1-18 of the General Laws in Chapter 9-1 entitled "Causes of
Action" is hereby amended to read as follows:
9-1-18. Effect of absence from state on limitations.
(a) If any person against whom there is or shall be cause for any action, as enumerated in
this chapter, in favor of a resident of the state, shall at the time the cause accrues be outside the
limits of the state, or being within the state at the time the cause accrues shall go out of the state
before the action is barred by the provisions of this chapter, and does not have or leave property or
estate in the state that can be attached by process of law, then the person entitled to the action may
commence the action, within the time before limited, after the person has returned into the state in
such a manner that an action may, with reasonable diligence, be commenced against him or her by
the person entitled to the action; provided, however, that no action shall be brought by any person
upon a cause of action accruing outside this state which was barred by limitation or otherwise in
the state, territory, or country in which the cause of action arose while he or she resided in the state.
(b)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if any person or entity, including an
individual or sole proprietor required to file under § 6-1-1, is required to register with the secretary
of state under title 7 ("corporations, associations, and partnerships") or § 6-1-1 and fails to do so,
the statute of limitations for any cause of action arising out of the business activities of that person
or entity shall be tolled regardless of whether that person or entity maintains a physical presence in

this state as defined in § 7-1.2-1401 (b), and shall not begin to run until the date the person or entity
becomes duly registered or authorized to transact business in this state.
(2) Voluntary compliance incentive. If the person or entity becomes duly registered or
authorized to transact business in this state before the earlier of:
(i) Receipt of written notice asserting a claim arising out of such business activities; or
(ii) Receipt of written notice from any state agency of a compliance inquiry or enforcement
action relating to such registration obligation, then the applicable statute of limitations for any such
cause of action shall begin to run on the date of such registration or authorization; provided,
however, that any such action shall be commenced within three (3) years after the date of such
registration or authorization, or within the otherwise applicable limitations period measured from
the date the cause of action accrued, whichever is later.
(3) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Person" has the same meaning as provided in § 6-1-1.1 and includes a natural person
acting as a sole proprietor who is required to file under § 6-1-1.
(ii) "Written notice" includes notice delivered by electronic mail.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005383
========
LC005383 - Page 2 of 3